District of Columbia statutes.
29-932

Bonding of officers and employees.

Every individual acting as officer or employee of an association and handling funds or securities amounting to $1,000 or more, in any one year, shall be covered by an adequate bond, as determined by the board of directors and at the expense of the association. The bylaws may also provide for the bonding of other employees or officers.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-932.
1981 Ed., § 29-1132.
1973 Ed., § 29-832.